Utah statutes.
17D-3-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Commission" means the Conservation Commission created under Section 4-18-4.

(2)  "Conservation district" means a limited purpose local government entity, as described in Section 17D-3-103, that operates under, is subject to, and has the powers set forth in this chapter.

(3)  "Department" means the Department of Agriculture and Food created under Section 4-2-1.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 360, 2008 General Session

